test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ito_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - ito: # o-stems Morottaja
    ito+N+Sg+Nom: ito
    ito+N+Sg+Gen: iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Acc: iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill: iton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc: iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com: iđoin
    ito+N+Sg+Abe: iđottáá
    ito+N+Ess: ittoon
    ito+N+Par: ittood
    ito+N+Pl+Nom: iđoh
    ito+N+Pl+Gen: iđoi
    ito+N+Pl+Acc: iđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Ill: iđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Loc: iiđoin
    ito+N+Pl+Com: iđoiguin
    ito+N+Pl+Abe: iđoittáá
